Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1114.08
County officers; minimum salaries; person occupying more than one office.

When the same person occupies more than one office in the same county, he shall receive only one minimum annual salary.

Laws 1961, c. 96, § 8, p. 326.